Illinois, session 104th, HB1604.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Limited Liability Company Act is amended by 5changing Section 50-10 as follows: 6    (805 ILCS 180/50-10)7    Sec. 50-10. Fees. 8    (a) The Secretary of State shall charge and collect in 9accordance with the provisions of this Act and rules 10promulgated under its authority all of the following:11        (1) Fees for filing documents.12        (2) Miscellaneous charges.13        (3) Fees for copies of any documents.14    (b) The Secretary of State shall charge and collect for 15all of the following:16        (1) Filing articles of organization (domestic), 17    application for admission (foreign), and restated articles 18    of organization (domestic), $150. Notwithstanding the 19    foregoing, the fee for filing articles of organization 20    (domestic), application for admission (foreign), and 21    restated articles of organization (domestic) in connection 22    with a limited liability company with a series or the 23    ability to establish a series pursuant to Section 37-40 of   HB1604- 2 -LRB104 07345 SPS 17385 b1    this Act is $400. 2        (2) Filing amendments (domestic or foreign), $50.3        (3) Filing a statement of termination or application 4    for withdrawal, $5.5        (4) Filing an application to reserve a name, $25.6        (5) Filing a notice of cancellation of a reserved 7    name, $5.8        (6) Filing a notice of a transfer of a reserved name, 9    $25.10        (7) Registration of a name, $50.11        (8) Renewal of registration of a name, $50.12        (9) Filing an application for use of an assumed name 13    under Section 1-20 of this Act, $150 for each year or part 14    thereof ending in 0 or 5, $120 for each year or part 15    thereof ending in 1 or 6, $90 for each year or part thereof 16    ending in 2 or 7, $60 for each year or part thereof ending 17    in 3 or 8, $30 for each year or part thereof ending in 4 or 18    9, and a renewal for each assumed name, $150.19        (9.5) Filing an application for change of an assumed 20    name, $25. 21        (10) Filing an application for cancellation of an 22    assumed name, $5.23        (11) Filing an annual report of a limited liability 24    company or foreign limited liability company, $75, if 25    filed as required by this Act, plus a penalty if 26    delinquent. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the fee for   HB1604- 3 -LRB104 07345 SPS 17385 b1    filing an annual report of a limited liability company or 2    foreign limited liability company is $75 plus $50 for each 3    series for which a certificate of designation has been 4    filed pursuant to Section 37-40 of this Act and is in 5    effect on the last day of the third month preceding the 6    company's anniversary month, plus a penalty if delinquent. 7    For each of the 5 years immediately following the 8    formation of a limited liability company, if that limited 9    liability company has a gross annual revenue of less than 10    $1,000,000, the fee for filing an annual report shall be 11    waived for that year.12        (12) Filing an application for reinstatement of a 13    limited liability company or foreign limited liability 14    company, $200.15        (13) Filing articles of merger, $100 plus $50 for each 16    party to the merger in excess of the first 2 parties.17        (14) (Blank).18        (15) Filing a statement of change of address of 19    registered office or change of registered agent, or both, 20    or filing a statement of correction, $25.21        (16) Filing a petition for refund, $5.22        (17) Filing a certificate of designation of a limited 23    liability company with a series pursuant to Section 37-40 24    of this Act, $50.25        (18) (Blank).26        (19) Filing, amending, or cancelling a statement of   HB1604- 4 -LRB104 07345 SPS 17385 b1    authority, $50.2        (20) Filing, amending, or cancelling a statement of 3    denial, $10. 4        (21) Filing any other document, $5.5        (22) For furnishing a copy or certified copy of any 6    document, instrument, or paper relating to a limited 7    liability company or foreign limited liability company, or 8    for a certificate, $25. 9    (c) (Blank).10(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-578, eff. 8-26-19; 11102-49, eff. 1-1-22.)